Illinois, session 104th, HB5622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-2b as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-2b)7    Sec. 5-2b. Medically fragile and technology dependent 8children eligibility and program; provider reimbursement 9rates. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law except as 11provided in Section 5-30a, on and after September 1, 2012, 12subject to federal approval, medical assistance under this 13Article shall be available to children who qualify as persons 14with a disability, as defined under the federal Supplemental 15Security Income program and who are medically fragile and 16technology dependent. The program shall allow eligible 17children to receive the medical assistance provided under this 18Article in the community and must maximize, to the fullest 19extent permissible under federal law, federal reimbursement 20and family cost-sharing, including co-pays, premiums, or any 21other family contributions, except that the Department shall 22be permitted to incentivize the utilization of selected 23services through the use of cost-sharing adjustments. The   HB5622- 2 -LRB104 16407 KTG 29797 b1Department shall establish the policies, procedures, 2standards, services, and criteria for this program by rule.3    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 4subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2024 5through December 31, 2024, the reimbursement rates for nursing 6paid through Nursing and Personal Care Services for non-waiver 7customers and to providers of private duty nursing services 8for children eligible for medical assistance under this 9Section shall be 20% higher than the reimbursement rates in 10effect for nursing services on December 31, 2023. 11    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 12subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025 13through December 31, 2026, the reimbursement rates for nursing 14paid through Nursing and Personal Care Services for non-waiver 15customers and to providers of private duty nursing services 16for children eligible for medical assistance under this 17Section shall be 7% higher than the reimbursement rates in 18effect for nursing services on December 31, 2024. 19    (d) The Department shall conduct an evaluation to study 20the program, including service provision and design, waiver 21operations, and methodologies and policies for setting rates 22and reimbursements for services and supports that are provided 23to (i) individuals under the age of 21 who are approved by the 24Department for in-home shift nursing services and (ii) 25individuals over the age of 21 who are receiving in-home shift 26nursing services under the Home and Community-Based Services   HB5622- 3 -LRB104 16407 KTG 29797 b1Waiver for Medically Fragile and Technology Dependent 2Children, including, but not limited to, in-home shift nursing 3services and related home and community-based services and 4supports, made to nursing agencies for such services. As 5needed, the Department shall consult with Department-enrolled 6providers of in-home shift nursing services to ensure accurate 7information is considered in the evaluation, and the 8Department may, to the extent it deems necessary and 9appropriate, contract with an outside entity to assist or 10provide further analysis in the support of the evaluation. 11    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 12subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2027, the 13reimbursement rates for nursing paid through Nursing and 14Personal Care Services for non-waiver customers and to 15providers of private duty nursing services for children 16eligible for medical assistance under this Section shall be 1720% higher than the reimbursement rates in effect for nursing 18services on December 31, 2026. 19(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 20104-9, eff. 6-16-25.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.